en: Doughnuts filled with raspberries
fi: Vadelmamunkit, Vadelmatäytemunkit, Vadelmalla täytetyt munkit
fr: Beignets fourrés à la framboise
hr: Krafne punjene malinama
nl: Donuts gevuld met framboos

en: Glazed doughnuts
fi: Kuorrutetut munkit, Kuorrutetut donitsit
hr: Glazirane krafne
ja: グレーズドドーナツ
lt: Spurgos su glaistu, Glazūruotos spurgos
nl: Geglazuurde donuts

en: Frozen doughnuts, Frozen donuts
fr: Donuts surgelés

en: Far Bretons, Fars, Far, Fars bretons, Breton fars
xx: Far Bretons
fr: Fars, Far, Fars bretons
nl: Fars

en: Breton pudding cake with prunes
fr: Far aux pruneaux

en: Breton pudding cake with raisins
fr: Far aux raisins

en: Breton pudding cake with apples
fr: Far aux pommes

en: Plain breton pudding cake
fr: Far nature

en: Clafoutis, clafouti
xx: Clafoutis
de: Clafoutis
es: Clafoutis
fr: Clafoutis, Milliards, Milliard
hr: Clafoutis
it: Clafoutis
ja: クラフティ
nl: Clafoutis, Clafouti

en: Fruits batter-pudding
fr: Clafoutis aux fruits

en: Refrigerated fruits batter-pudding, Refrigerated fruit batter pudding
fr: Clafoutis aux fruits rayon frais

en: Cherry clafoutis
fr: Clafoutis aux cerises
hr: Trešnja clafoutis
nl: Kersenclafoutis, Kersenclafouti

en: Panettone
xx: Panettone
bg: Панетоне
de: Panettone
es: Panettone
fi: Panettone
fr: Panettone, Panettones, Panetonnes, Panetonne
he: פנטונה
hr: Panettone
it: Panettone
ja: パネットーネ, パネトーネ
lt: Panetone, Panetonne
nl: Panettones, Panettone, panetonnes, panetonne
pt: Panettone

bg: Панетоне с череши
fr: Panettone aux cerises

bg: Панетоне с шоколад
fr: Panettone au chocolat

bg: Панетоне без глутен
fr: Panettone sans gluten

en: Pandoro
xx: Pandoro
fr: Pandoro
hr: Pandoro
it: Pandoro
ja: パンドーロ

en: Colomba
xx: Colomba
fr: Colomba
hr: Colomba
it: Colomba, Colomba Pasquale, Colomba di Pasqua
ja: コロンバ

en: Small brioches
de: Kleine Brioches
fi: pienet briossit
fr: Briochettes
hr: Mali brioši
nl: Kleine brioches

en: Puddings
bg: Пудинг
cs: Pudinky
de: Puddings
fi: vanukkaat
fr: Puddings, Pudding
hr: puding
it: Puddings
lt: Pudingai
nl: Puddings, Pudding
ru: Пудинги, Пудинг